California statutes. Business and Professions Code
(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 510, Sec. 84.   (SB 887)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

5108.

In connection with any investigation or action authorized by this chapter, the board may issue subpoenas for the attendance of witnesses and the production of papers, books, accounts, documents and testimony pertinent or material to its inquiry, investigation, hearing, proceeding, or action conducted in any part of the state.

(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 231) by Stats. 2002, Ch. 1150, Sec. 42.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

5109.

The expiration, cancellation, forfeiture, or suspension of a license, practice privilege, or other authority to practice public accountancy by operation of law or by order or decision of the board or a court of law, the placement of a license on a retired status, or the voluntary surrender of a license by a licensee shall not deprive the board of jurisdiction to commence or proceed with any investigation of or action or disciplinary proceeding against the licensee, or to render a decision suspending or revoking the license.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 395, Sec. 3.   (AB 431)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

5110.

(a) After notice and an opportunity for a hearing, the board may deny an application to take the licensing examination, deny admission to current and future licensing examinations, void examination grades, and deny an application for a license or registration to any individual who has committed any of the following acts:

(1) Made any false, fraudulent, or materially misleading statement or a material omission in any application for a license, examination, or registration.

(2) Cheated or subverted or attempted to subvert any licensing examination.

(3) Aided, abetted, or conspired with any other person to violate paragraph (1) or (2).

(4) Any act that if committed by an applicant for licensure would be grounds for denial of a license or registration under Section 480 or if committed by a licensee or a registrant would be grounds for discipline under Section 5100.

(5) Any act committed outside of this state that would be a violation of this article if committed within this state.

(b) Neither the withdrawal of an application for examination, licensure, or registration, nor the expulsion or voluntary departure from an examination shall deprive the board of its authority to deny an application for, or admittance to, current or future licensing examinations, or to commence or continue a proceeding based on a violation of this article.

(c) Nothing in this article shall be construed to limit the authority of the board to refuse admittance to or to remove from the licensing examination, any person suspected of cheating or failing to comply with examination procedures or requirements.

(d) The term “licensing examination” includes the Uniform Certified Public Accountant examination, ethics examination, and any other professional or vocational licensing examination offered or administered by, or through, the board or other agencies within or outside of this state, for professional or vocational licensing purposes.

(e) The board may take any of the actions described in subdivision (a) based upon any determination, decision, ruling, or finding made by any state or other governmental entity, foreign or domestic, that any individual has committed any of the actions described in paragraphs (1) to (5), inclusive, of subdivision (a).

(f) The provisions of this section are in addition to any other remedies that may be available under other provisions of law including, but not limited to, those set forth in Sections 123, 480, and 496.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1054, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

5111.

Cheating on, or subverting or attempting to subvert any licensing examination includes, but is not limited to, engaging in, soliciting, or procuring any of the following:

(a) Any communication between one or more examinees and any person, other than a proctor or examination official, while the examination is in progress.

(b) Any communication between one or more examinees and any other person at any time concerning the content of the examination including, but not limited to, any examination question or answer, unless the examination has been publicly released by the examining authority or jurisdiction.

(c) The taking of all or a part of the examination by a person other than the applicant.

(d) Possession or use at any time during the examination or while the examinee is on the examination premises of any device, material, or document that is not expressly authorized for use by examinees during the examination including, but not limited to, notes, crib sheets, textbooks, and electronic devices.

(e) Failure to follow any examination instruction or rule related to examination security.

(f) Providing false, fraudulent, or materially misleading information concerning education, experience, or other qualifications as part of, or in support of, any application for admission to any professional or vocational examination.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 159, Sec. 19.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

5112.

(a) The board may deny an application to take the licensing examination, deny admittance to current and future licensing examinations, and void examination grades on the grounds set forth in Section 5110 using either of the following procedures:

(1) Notifying the individual in writing of all of the following:

(A) The action the board has taken.

(B) The reasons the action was taken.

(C) The earliest date on which the individual may reapply for admittance to the licensing examination.

(D) The individual’s right to a hearing under the provisions of Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code if a written request for a hearing is made within 60 days from the date of the board’s notice. If the individual does not request a hearing, the board’s action shall become final at the expiration of this 60-day period.

(2) Filing and serving a statement of issues in accordance with Section 11504 of the Government Code.

(b) The board shall issue the notice of action under paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) or file and serve the statement of issues under paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) within five years of the last day of the examination with respect to which the alleged prohibited act was committed or within three years of the discovery of the commission of the alleged prohibited act, whichever occurs later.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1054, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

5113.

An individual who has been denied admission to the licensing examination under Section 5110 may petition the board for admission to the Certified Public Accountant examination not less than one year after the effective date of the decision issued by the board following a hearing held pursuant to the provisions of Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code or, if there was no hearing, may petition the board not less than one year after the decision or action pursuant to the notice of action issued by the board becomes final as provided in subparagraph (D) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 5112, unless the decision or notice of action issued by the board specifies a different timeframe within which this petition may be filed. However, in no event shall the timeframe specified by the board be more than three years from the effective date of the board’s decision or from the date that the board’s action pursuant to the notice of action becomes final.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1054, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

5115.

(a) A person whose license has been revoked or surrendered may petition the board for reinstatement or reduction of penalty after a period of not less than one year has elapsed from the effective date of the decision or from the date of the denial of a similar petition, unless a longer period, not to exceed three years, is specified by the board in any decision revoking the license, accepting the surrender of the license, or denying reinstatement of the license.

(b) A person whose license has not been revoked or surrendered but who has been disciplined by imposition of a suspension or otherwise disciplined may petition the board for reinstatement or reduction of penalty after a period of not less than one year has elapsed from the effective date of the decision.

(c) The board shall give notice to the Attorney General of the filing of the petition and the Attorney General and the petitioner shall be afforded an opportunity to present either oral or written argument before the board itself. The board itself shall rule on the petition, and the decision shall include the reasons therefor and any terms and conditions that the board reasonably deems appropriate to impose as a condition of reinstatement or reduction of penalty, including, but not limited to, restrictions on the petitioner’s scope of professional practice.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 807, Sec. 13.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6.5. Administrative Penalties [5116. - 5116.6.]

5116.

(a) The board, after appropriate notice and an opportunity for hearing, may order any licensee or applicant for licensure or examination to pay an administrative penalty as provided in this article as part of any disciplinary proceeding or other proceeding provided for in this chapter.

(b) The board may assess administrative penalties under one or more provisions of this article. However, the total administrative penalty to be paid by the licensee shall not exceed the amount of the highest administrative penalty authorized by this article.

(c) The board shall adopt regulations to establish criteria for assessing administrative penalties based upon factors, including, but not limited to, actual and potential consumer harm, nature and severity of the violation, the role of the person in the violation, the person’s ability to pay the administrative penalty, and the level of administrative penalty necessary to deter future violations of this chapter.

(d) Administrative penalties assessed under this article shall be in addition to any other penalties or sanctions imposed on the licensee or other person, including, but not limited to, license revocation, license suspension, denial of the application for licensure, denial of the petition for reinstatement, or denial of admission to the licensing examination. Payment of these administrative penalties may be included as a condition of probation when probation is ordered.

(e) All administrative penalties collected under this article shall be deposited in the Accountancy Fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 921, Sec. 14.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

5116.1.

In accordance with Section 5116 and applicable regulations, except as provided in Section 5116.2, any licensee who violates any provision of this chapter may be assessed an administrative penalty of not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000) for the first violation and not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000) for each subsequent violation.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 921, Sec. 14.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

5116.2.

In accordance with Section 5116 and applicable regulations, any licensee who violates subdivision (a), (c), (i), (j) or (k) of Section 5100 may be assessed an administrative penalty of not more than one million dollars ($1,000,000) for the first violation and not more than five million dollars ($5,000,000) for any subsequent violation, except that a licensee who is a natural person may be assessed an administrative penalty of not more than fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) for the first violation and not more than one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) for any subsequent violation.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 921, Sec. 14.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

5116.3.

In accordance with Section 5116 and applicable regulations, any person who is found to have cheated or subverted or attempted to subvert or cheat on any licensing examination or who conspired with or aided or abetted any other person to cheat, subvert or attempt to subvert any examination may be assessed an administrative penalty of not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000) for the first violation and not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000) for each subsequent violation.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 921, Sec. 14.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

5116.4.

(a) The board’s executive officer may request assessment of an administrative penalty in any disciplinary or other proceeding provided in this chapter or in any notice to an applicant pursuant to Section 5112.

(b) The administrative penalty pursuant to subdivision (a) shall become final unless contested within the time period provided for the filing of a notice of appeal, for the filing of a notice of defense, or for requesting a hearing in the proceeding.

(c) Nothing in this article shall prevent an administrative penalty from being included in a final contested or default decision of the board or in a notice issued pursuant to Section 5112 once the time period for requesting a hearing has expired.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 921, Sec. 14.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

5116.5.

The board may obtain a judgment in any court of competent jurisdiction ordering the payment of any final administrative penalty assessed by the board pursuant to this article upon the filing of a certified copy of the board’s final decision or notice issued pursuant to Section 5112.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 921, Sec. 14.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

5116.6.

Anywhere the term “licensee” is used in the article it shall include certified public accountants, public accountants, partnerships, corporations, holders of practice privileges, other persons licensed, registered, or otherwise authorized to practice public accountancy under this chapter, and persons who are in violation of any provision of Article 5.1 (commencing with Section 5096).

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 921, Sec. 14.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Prohibitions and Offenses Against the Chapter Generally [5120. - 5122.]

5120.

Any person who violates Article 3 (commencing with Section 5050) is guilty of a misdemeanor, punishable by imprisonment for not more than six months, or by a fine of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000), or both.

Whenever the board has reason to believe that any person is liable to punishment under this article, the board or with its approval the enforcement advisory committee, may certify the facts to the appropriate enforcement officer of the city or county where the alleged violation had taken place and the officer may cause appropriate proceedings to be brought.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 415, Sec. 8.   (SB 1491)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

5121.

The display or uttering by a person of a card, sign, advertisement or other printed, engraved or written instrument or device, bearing a person’s name in conjunction with the words “certified public accountant” or any abbreviation thereof or the words “public accountant” or any abbreviation thereof shall be prima facie evidence in any prosecution, proceeding or hearing brought under this article that the person whose name is so displayed caused or procured the display or uttering of such card, sign, advertisement or other printed, engraved or written instrument or device. Any such display or uttering shall be prima facie evidence that the person whose name is so displayed holds themselves out as a certified public accountant, or a public accountant holding a permit to practice public accountancy in this state
 under the provisions of this chapter. In any prosecution or hearing under this chapter, evidence of the commission of a single act prohibited by this chapter shall be sufficient to justify a conviction without evidence of a general course of conduct.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 510, Sec. 85.   (SB 887)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

5122.

Whenever in the judgment of the board, or with its approval the enforcement advisory committee, any person has engaged, or is about to engage, in any acts or practices that constitute, or will constitute, an offense against this chapter, the board may make application to the appropriate court for an order enjoining the acts or practices, and upon showing by the board that the person has engaged, or is about to engage, in any such acts or practices, an injunction, restraining order, or other order that may be appropriate shall be granted by the court.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 415, Sec. 9.   (SB 1491)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8. Revenue [5130. - 5134.]

5130.

The board shall charge and collect a fee from each applicant for the certificate of certified public accountant. The fee shall accompany the application, which must be made on a form provided by the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 422, Sec. 3.   (SB 1492)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

5131.

(a) The board may charge and collect an application fee and an examination fee from each applicant. The applicable fees shall accompany the application which shall be made on a form provided by the board.

(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, the board may authorize an organization specified by the board pursuant to Section 5082.1 to receive directly from applicants payment of the examination fees charged by that organization as payment for examination materials and services.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 807, Sec. 14.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

5132.

(a) All moneys received by the board under this chapter from any source and for any purpose and from a temporary license issued under Section 115.6 shall be accounted for and reported monthly by the board to the Controller and at the same time the moneys shall be remitted to the State Treasury to the credit of the Accountancy Fund.

(b) The secretary-treasurer of the board shall, from time to time, but not less than once each fiscal year, prepare or have prepared on their behalf, a financial report of the Accountancy Fund that contains information that the board determines is necessary for the purposes for which the board was established.

(c) The report of the Accountancy Fund, which shall be published pursuant to Section 5008, shall include the revenues and the related costs from examination, initial licensing, license renewal, citation and fine authority, and cost recovery from enforcement actions and case settlements.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 693, Sec. 6.   (AB 107)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

5133.

All money in the Accountancy Fund is hereby appropriated to the California Board of Accountancy to carry out the provisions of this chapter. Each member of the board and each member of a committee shall receive a per diem and expenses as provided in Section 103.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 657, Sec. 29.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

5134.

The amount of fees prescribed by this chapter is as follows:

(a) The fee to be charged to each applicant for the certified public accountant examination shall be fixed by the board at an amount not to exceed six hundred dollars ($600). The board may charge a reexamination fee not to exceed seventy-five dollars ($75) for each part that is subject to reexamination.

(b) The application fee to be charged to each applicant for issuance of a certified public accountant certificate shall be fixed by the board at an amount not to exceed seven hundred dollars ($700).

(c) After June 30, 2024, the fee to be charged to each applicant for registration as a partnership or professional corporation shall not be less than two hundred fifty dollars ($250) and shall not exceed two thousand dollars ($2,000).

(d) (1) The biennial renewal fee for a certified public accountant to engage in the practice of public accountancy, as specified in Section 5070, shall be three hundred
 forty dollars ($340) for permits expiring after June 30, 2024.

(2) The biennial renewal fee for a certified public accountant to engage in the practice of public
 accountancy, as specified in Section 5070, shall be four hundred dollars ($400) for permits expiring after June 30, 2026.

(e) (1) The biennial renewal fee for a partnership or professional corporation shall be four hundred dollars ($400) for permits expiring after June 30, 2024.

(2) The biennial renewal fee for a partnership or professional corporation shall be five hundred twenty dollars ($520) for permits expiring after June 30,
 2026.

(f) If the board has unencumbered funds in an amount that is equal to more than the board’s operating budget for the next two fiscal years, the board may fix the biennial renewal fees by regulation at an amount less than those identified in subdivision (d) for certified public accountants and subdivision (e) for partnerships and professional corporations.

(g) The application fee to be charged to each applicant for a retired status license, as described in Section 5070.1, shall be fixed by the board at an amount not to exceed two hundred fifty dollars ($250).

(h) The application fee to be charged to each applicant for restoration of a license in a retired status to an active status pursuant to subdivision (f) of Section 5070.1 shall be fixed by the board at an amount not to exceed one
 thousand dollars ($1,000).

(i) The delinquency fee shall be 50 percent of the accrued renewal fee.

(j) The initial permit fee is an amount equal to the renewal fee in effect on the last regular renewal date before the date on which the permit is issued, except that, if the permit is issued one year or less before it will expire, then the initial permit fee is an amount equal to 50 percent of the renewal fee in effect on the last regular renewal date before the date on which the permit is issued. The board may, by regulation, provide for the waiver or refund of the initial permit fee where the permit is issued less than 45 days before the date on which it will expire.

(k) The fee to be charged for the certification of documents evidencing passage of the certified public accountant examination, the certification of documents evidencing the grades received on the certified public accountant examination, or the certification of documents evidencing licensure shall be twenty-five dollars ($25).

(l) The board shall fix the fees in accordance with the limits of this section and any increase in a fee fixed by the board shall be pursuant to regulation duly adopted by the
 board in accordance with the limits of this section.

(m) It is the intent of the Legislature that, to ease entry into the public accounting profession in California, any administrative cost to the board related to the certified public accountant examination or issuance of the certified public accountant certificate that exceeds the maximum fees authorized by this section shall be covered by the fees charged for the biennial renewal of the permit to practice.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 723, Sec. 20.5.   (SB 816)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 9. Accountancy Corporations [5150. - 5158.]

5150.

An accountancy corporation is a corporation which is registered with the California Board of Accountancy and has a currently effective certificate of registration from the board pursuant to the Moscone-Knox Professional Corporation Act, as contained in Part 4 (commencing with Section 13400) of Division 3 of Title 1 of the Corporations Code, and this article. Subject to all applicable statutes, rules and regulations, an accountancy corporation is entitled to practice accountancy. With respect to an accountancy corporation, the governmental agency referred to in the Moscone-Knox Professional Corporation Act is the California Board of Accountancy.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1055, Sec. 4.   Effective September 30, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

5151.

An applicant for registration as an accountancy corporation shall supply to the board all necessary and pertinent documents and information requested by the board concerning the applicant’s plan of operation. The board may provide forms of application. If the board finds that the corporation is duly organized and existing under the General Corporation Law or the foreign corporation is duly qualified for the transaction of intrastate business pursuant to the General Corporation Law, that, except as otherwise permitted under Section 5053 or 5079, each officer, director, shareholder, or employee who will render professional services is a licensed person as defined in the Moscone-Knox Professional Corporation Act, or a person licensed to render the same professional services in the jurisdiction or jurisdictions in
 which the person practices, and that from the application it appears that the affairs of the corporation will be conducted in compliance with law and the rules and regulations of the board, the board shall upon payment of the registration fee in the amount as it may determine, issue a certificate of registration. The applicant shall include with the application for each shareholder of the corporation licensed in a foreign country but not in this state or in any other state, territory, or possession of the United States, a certificate from the authority in the foreign country currently having final jurisdiction over the practice of accounting, which shall verify the shareholder’s admission to practice in the foreign country, the date thereof, and the fact that the shareholder is currently in good standing as the equivalent of a certified public accountant or public accountant. If the certificate is not in English, there shall be included with the certificate a duly authenticated English translation thereof.
 The application shall be signed and verified by an officer of the corporation. At the time of application, if the corporation has a valid email address, it shall provide that email address to the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 359, Sec. 16.   (AB 1521)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

5152.

Each accountancy corporation shall file with the board at the times the board may require a report containing information pertaining to qualification and compliance with the statutes, rules and regulations of the board as the board may determine. All reports shall be signed and verified by an officer of the corporation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1077, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

5152.1.

Each accountancy corporation shall renew its permit to practice biennially and shall pay the renewal fee fixed by the board in accordance with Section 5134. At the time of renewal, if the corporation has a valid email address, it shall provide that email address to the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 359, Sec. 17.   (AB 1521)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

5154.

Except as provided in Section 5079 of this code and in Section 13403 of the Corporations Code, each director, shareholder, and officer of an accountancy corporation shall be a licensed person as defined in the Moscone-Knox Professional Corporation Act, or a person licensed to render the same professional services in the jurisdiction or jurisdictions in which the person practices.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1054, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

5155.

The income of an accountancy corporation attributable to professional services rendered while a shareholder is a disqualified person (as defined in the Moscone-Knox Professional Corporation Act) shall not in any manner accrue to the benefit of such shareholder or his shares in the accountancy corporation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1113.)
-------------------------------------------

5156.

An accountancy corporation shall not do or fail to do any act the doing of which or the failure to do which would constitute unprofessional conduct under any statute, rule or regulation now or hereafter in effect. In the conduct of its practice, it shall observe and be bound by such statutes, rules and regulations to the same extent as a person holding a permit under Section 5070 of this code. The board shall have the same powers of suspension, revocation and discipline against an accountancy corporation as are now or hereafter authorized by Section 5100 of this code, or by any other similar statute against individual licensees, provided, however, that proceedings against an accountancy corporation shall be conducted in accordance with Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, and the board shall have all the powers granted therein.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1113.)
-------------------------------------------

5157.

The board may formulate and enforce rules and regulations to carry out the purposes and objectives of this article, including rules and regulations requiring (a) that the articles of incorporation or bylaws of an accountancy corporation shall include a provision whereby the capital stock of such corporation owned by a disqualified person (as defined in the Moscone-Knox Professional Corporation Act), or a deceased person, shall be sold to the corporation or to the remaining shareholders of such corporation within such time as such rules and regulations may provide, and (b) that an accountancy corporation as a condition of obtaining a certificate pursuant to the Moscone-Knox Professional Corporation Act and this article shall provide adequate security by insurance or otherwise for claims against it by its clients arising out of the rendering of professional services.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1113.)
-------------------------------------------

5158.

Each office of an accountancy corporation engaged in the practice of public accountancy in this state shall be managed by a certified public accountant or public accountant.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 92.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 2. Advertisers [5200. - 5486.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [5200. - 5231.]

5200.

This chapter of the Business and Professions Code constitutes the chapter on advertisers. It may be cited as the Outdoor Advertising Act.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 991.)
-------------------------------------------

5201.

Unless the context otherwise requires, the general provisions set forth in this article govern the construction of this chapter.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 991.)
-------------------------------------------

5202.

“Advertising display” refers to advertising structures and to signs.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 991.)
-------------------------------------------

5203.

“Advertising structure” means a structure of any kind or character erected, used, or maintained for outdoor advertising purposes, upon which any poster, bill, printing, painting or other advertisement of any kind whatsoever may be placed, including statuary, for advertising purposes.

“Advertising structure” does not include:

(a) Official notices issued by any court or public body or officer;

(b) Notices posted by any public officer in performance of a public duty or by any person in giving legal notice;

(c) Directional, warning or information structures required by or authorized by law or by federal, state or county authority.

(d) A structure erected near a city or county boundary, which contains the name of such city or county and the names of, or any other information regarding, civic, fraternal or religious organizations located therein.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 991, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

5204.

“Bonus segment” means any segment of an interstate highway which was covered by the Federal Aid Highway Act of 1958 and the Collier-Z'berg Act, namely, any such segment which is constructed upon right-of-way, the entire width of which was acquired subsequent to July 1, 1956.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 991.)
-------------------------------------------

5205.

“Business area” means an area within 1,000 feet, measured in each direction, from the nearest edge of a commercial or industrial building or activity and which is zoned under authority of state law primarily to permit industrial or commercial activities or an unzoned commercial or industrial area.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 991.)
-------------------------------------------

5206.

“Centerline of the highway” means a line equidistant from the edges of the median separating the main traveled way of a divided highway, or the centerline of the main traveled way of a nondivided highway.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 991.)
-------------------------------------------

5208.

“Collier-Z'berg Act” refers to Chapter 128, Statutes of 1964 (First Extraordinary Session).

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 991.)
-------------------------------------------

5208.6.

“Department” means the Department of Transportation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 649, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

5209.

“Director” refers to the Director of Transportation of the State of California.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 579.)
-------------------------------------------

5210.

“Federal Aid Highway Act of 1958” refers to Section 131 of Title 23 of the United States Code, as in effect before October 22, 1965.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 991.)
-------------------------------------------

5211.

“Flashing” is a light or message that changes more than once every four seconds.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 787, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

5212.

“Freeway,” for the purposes of this chapter only, means a divided arterial highway for through traffic with full control of access and with grade separations at intersections.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 991.)
-------------------------------------------

5213.

“Highway” includes roads, streets, boulevards, lanes, courts, places, commons, trails, ways or other rights-of-way or easements used for or laid out and intended for the public passage of vehicles or of vehicles and persons.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 991.)
-------------------------------------------

5214.

“Highway Beautification Act of 1965” refers to Section 131 of Title 23 of the United States Code, as in effect October 22, 1965.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 991.)
-------------------------------------------

5215.

“Interstate highway” means any highway at any time officially designated as a part of the national system of interstate and defense highways by the director and approved by appropriate authority of the federal government.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 991.)
-------------------------------------------

5216.

(a) “Landscaped freeway” means a section or sections of a freeway that is now, or hereafter may be, improved by the planting at least on one side or on the median of the freeway right-of-way of lawns, trees, shrubs, flowers, or other ornamental vegetation requiring reasonable maintenance.

(b) Planting for the purpose of soil erosion control; traffic safety requirements, including light
 screening; reduction of fire hazards; covering soundwalls or fences; or traffic noise abatement shall not change the character of a freeway to a landscaped freeway.

(c) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), if an agreement to relocate advertising displays from within one area of a city or county to an area adjacent to a freeway right-of-way has been entered into between a city or county and the owner of an advertising display, then a “landscaped freeway” shall not include the median of a freeway right-of-way.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 926, Sec. 1.   (AB 3168)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

5216.1.

“Lawfully erected” means, in reference to advertising displays, advertising displays which were erected in compliance with state laws and local ordinances in effect at the time of their erection or which were subsequently brought into full compliance with state laws and local ordinances, except that the term does not apply to any advertising display whose use is modified after erection in a manner which causes it to become illegal. There shall be a rebuttable presumption pursuant to Section 606 of the Evidence Code that an advertising display is lawfully erected if it has been in existence for a period of five years or longer without the owner having received written notice during that period from a governmental entity stating that the display was not lawfully erected.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 653, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

5216.3.

“Main-traveled way” is the traveled way of a highway on which through traffic is carried. In the case of a divided highway, the traveled way of each of the separate roadways for traffic in opposite directions is a main-traveled way. Main-traveled way does not include facilities such as frontage roads, ramps, auxiliary lanes, parking areas, or shoulders.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 5216.2 by Stats. 2000, Ch. 787, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

5216.4.

“Message center” is an advertising display where the message is changed more than once every two minutes, but no more than once every four seconds.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 787, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

5216.5.

“Nonconforming advertising display” is an advertising display that was lawfully placed, but that does not conform to the provisions of this chapter, or the administrative regulations adopted pursuant to this chapter, that were enacted subsequent to the date of placing.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 5216.3 by Stats. 2000, Ch. 787, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

5216.6.

(a) “Officially designated scenic highway or scenic byway” is any state highway that has been officially designated and maintained as a state scenic highway pursuant to Sections 260, 261, 262, and 262.5 of the Streets and Highways Code or that has been officially designated a scenic byway as referred to in Section 131(s) of Title 23 of the United States Code.
